src/fst/morphology/incoming/resplit/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PERS_PRON
niistówa+Pron+Pers+1Sg:niistówa # ;
niistówa+Pron+Pers+1Sg:niistó # ;
niistówa+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Obv:niistóyi # ;
kiistówa+Pron+Pers+2Sg:kiistówa # ;
kiistówa+Pron+Pers+2Sg:kiistó # ;
kiistówa+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Obv:kiistóyi # ;
ostóyi+Pron+Pers+3Sg:ostóyi # ;
niistónnaana+Pron+Pers+1Pl:niistónnaana # ;
niistónnaana+Pron+Pers+1Pl:niistónnaan # ;
niistónnaana+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Obv:niistónnaani # ;
kiistónoona+Pron+Pers+21Pl:kiistónoona # ;
kiistónoona+Pron+Pers+21Pl:kiistónoon # ;
kiistónoona+Pron+Pers+21Pl+Obv:kiistónooni # ;
kiistówaawa+Pron+Pers+2Pl:kiistówaawa # ;
kiistówaawa+Pron+Pers+2Pl:kiistówaaw # ;
kiistówaawa+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Obv:kiistówaawi # ;
ostówaawayi+Pron+Pers+3Pl:ostówaawayi # ;

LEXICON INTERR_PRON
takáa+Pron+Interr+3Sg/Pl:takáa # ;
tahkáa+Pron+Interr+3Sg/Pl:tahkáa # ;
tsikáa+Pron+Interr+4Sg/Pl:tsikáa # ;
tsá+Pron+Interr+3Sg/Pl:tsá # ;
tsá+Pron+Interr+0Sg/Pl:tsá # ;
ááhsa+Pron+Interr+0Sg/Pl:ááhsa # ;
tsimá+Pron+Interr:tsimá # ;
